sl-SI: Standardna velikost sukanca: Denier; Tex; Teža (wt); Drugo
en: Thread standard size: Denier (denier); Tex; Weight (wt); Other
tr: Diş standardı ölçüsü: Denye (denye); Tex; Ağırlık (wt); Diğer
nb: Standardstørrelse for gjenger: Denier (denier); Tex; Vekt (wt); Annet
sk-SK: Štandardná veľkosť závitu: Denier (den); Tex; Hrúbka (wt); Iné
fr: Taille standard du filetage: Denier; Tex; Poids (wt); Autre
bg-BG: Стандартен размер на резбата: Дение (denier); Tex; Тегло (wt); Друго
ro-RO: Dimensiune standard a aței: Denier (den); Tex; Greutate (wt); Altele
th: ขนาดเกลียวมาตรฐาน: ดีเนียร์ (denier); เท็กซ์ (Tex); น้ำหนัก (wt); อื่นๆ
vi: Kích thước tiêu chuẩn của ren: Denier (denier); Tex; Trọng lượng (wt); Khác
zh-TW: 線材標準尺寸: 丹尼數 (denier); 特克斯 (Tex); 重量 (wt); 其他
nl: Draadstandaardgrootte: Denier (denier); Tex; Gewicht (wt); Overige
hr-HR: Standardna veličina navoja: Denier (den); Tex; Težina (wt); Ostalo
sv: Gängstandardstorlek: Denier (denier); Tex; Vikt (wt); Annat
ru: Стандартный размер нити: Денье (den); Текс; Номер/вес (wt); Другое
zh-CN: 线材标准尺寸: 旦尼尔 (denier); Tex; 粗细 (wt); 其他
ko: 나사산 표준 크기: 데니어(denier); 텍스(Tex); 무게(wt); 기타
cs: Standardní velikost nitě: Denier (denier); Tex; Gramáž (wt); Ostatní
da: Standardstørrelse for tråd: Denier (denier); Tex; Vægt (wt); Andet
pt-BR: Tamanho padrão dos cabos: Denier (denier); Tex; Peso (wt); Outros
ja: スレッド標準サイズ: デニール (denier); Tex; ウェイト (wt); その他
hu: Cérna standard mérete: Denier (den); Tex; Súly (wt); Egyéb
fi: Kierteen standardikoko: Denier (denier); Tex; Paino (wt); Muu
pt-PT: Tamanho padrão do fio: Denier (denier); Tex; Peso (wt); Outro
it: Taglia standard del filo: Denari (denari); Tex; Peso (wt); Altro
de: Standardmaße des Fadens: Denier (denier); Tex; Gewicht (wt); Sonstige
lt-LT: Siūlų standartinis dydis: Denjė (denier); Teksas (tex); Svoris (wt); Kitas
pl: Standardowy rozmiar nici: Denier (den); Tex; Grubość (wt); Inne
es: Tamaño estándar de rosca: Denier (denier); Tex; Peso (wt); Otro
el: Τυπικό μέγεθος σπειρώματος: Ντενιέ (denier); Tex; Βάρος (wt); Άλλο